New York, session 2025-2026, A10794.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Hospice and palliative care workgroup. The commissioner of 2 health shall establish a hospice and palliative care workgroup (referred 3 to in this section as the "workgroup") within the department of health. 4 § 2. Definitions. For purposes of this act, the following terms shall 5 have the following meanings: 6 1. "Hospice" shall mean a coordinated program of home and in-patient 7 care which treats the terminally ill patient and family as a unit, 8 employing an interdisciplinary team acting under the direction of an 9 autonomous hospice administration. The program provides palliative and 10 supportive care to meet the special needs arising out of physical, 11 psychological, spiritual, social, and economic stresses which are expe- 12 rienced during the final stages of illness, and during dying and 13 bereavement. 14 2. "Palliative care" shall mean a health care treatment, including 15 interdisciplinary end-of-life care, and consultation with patients and 16 family members, to prevent or relieve pain and suffering and to enhance 17 the patient's quality of life, including hospice care under article 40 18 of the public health law. 19 3. "Geriatrics" is defined as a branch of medicine that focuses on 20 health promotion, prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of disease and 21 disability in older adults. 22 4. "Home care" is defined as a health service provided in the 23 patient's home to promote, maintain, or restore health or lessen the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08709-01-5 A. 10794 2 1 effects of illness and disability. Services may include nursing care, 2 speech, physical and occupational therapies, home health aide services, 3 and personal care services. 4 § 3. Workgroup membership. 1. Workgroup members shall include: 5 (a) the commissioner of health, or their designee; 6 (b) the commissioner of mental health, or their designee; 7 (c) the commissioner of education, or their designee; 8 (d) the commissioner of the office for people with developmental disa- 9 bilities, or their designee; 10 (e) the director of the office for the aging, or their designee; 11 (f) the chancellors of the State University of New York and the City 12 University of New York, or their designees; 13 (g) representatives of medical schools and hospital organizations; 14 (h) representatives of medical academies; 15 (i) patient advocates; 16 (j) individual representatives of an organization broadly represen- 17 tative of physicians specializing in hospice and palliative care; 18 (k) stakeholders, including physicians and medical professionals 19 specializing in anesthesia, advanced care, cardiology, family medicine, 20 geriatric medicine, geriatrics, gerontology, hematology, home care, 21 hospice and palliative medicine, internal medicine, neurology, nursing, 22 obstetrics-gynecology, oncology, pain management, pediatrics, psychia- 23 try, pulmonary and critical care, social work, and surgery; 24 (l) representatives from health care provider organizations; and 25 (m) representatives from the philanthropic community. 26 2. Workgroup members shall have expertise in hospice and palliative 27 care or pain management. 28 3. Eleven additional workgroup members, with expertise in hospice and 29 palliative care or pain management, shall be appointed as follows: 30 (a) three members shall be appointed by the governor; 31 (b) two members shall be appointed by the temporary president of the 32 senate; 33 (c) two members shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 34 (d) two members shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 35 senate; and 36 (e) two members shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 37 assembly. 38 4. Additional members may be added to the workgroup as determined by 39 the commissioner of health. 40 5. Workgroup members shall be appointed within 60 days after the 41 effective date of this act. 42 6. Workgroup members shall serve a term of one year with renewable 43 terms. 44 7. Workgroup members shall not receive compensation for their services 45 as members of the workgroup. 46 § 4. Duties of workgroup. The workgroup shall examine and identify: 47 1. the current state of palliative care, hospice care, geriatrics, and 48 pain management services offered in New York state; 49 2. the establishment, maintenance, operation, and evaluation of 50 outcomes of hospice care initiatives in New York state; 51 3. the capacity of current hospice, palliative care, and geriatric 52 providers in New York state; 53 4. the geographic areas where significant gaps in hospice and pallia- 54 tive care services exist; A. 10794 3 1 5. the barriers and factors contributing to underutilization of 2 hospice and palliative care in New York state, including, but not limit- 3 ed to, system, educational, clinician, patient, and workforce barriers; 4 6. any financial incentives available to promote the establishment of 5 high-quality interdisciplinary hospice and palliative care programs and 6 services in New York state; 7 7. any and all current instruction in palliative care and pain manage- 8 ment through state health licensure and continuing education guidelines; 9 8. the effectiveness and promotion of the statewide advance care plan- 10 ning campaign, including any potential areas of improvement; 11 9. any opportunities to collaborate with key stakeholders who are 12 positioned to craft a strategy and plan for improving and expanding the 13 provision of high-quality palliative medicine and hospice and palliative 14 care services in New York state; 15 10. the feasibility for financial support of a long-term expansion of 16 hospice and palliative care services in New York state; 17 11. a plan for ongoing data gathering for purposes of monitoring and 18 quality improvement of hospice and palliative care in New York state; 19 12. engagement strategies for better educating the public about 20 hospice and palliative care to empower people to make informed decisions 21 about their care when faced with a serious or terminal illness; 22 13. mental health impacts associated with end-of-life planning, coun- 23 seling, and care, and palliative care, palliative psychiatry, or hospice 24 care; 25 14. ethical considerations concerning end-of-life planning, coun- 26 seling, and care, and palliative care, palliative psychiatry, or hospice 27 care; 28 15. utilization and distribution of grants for undergraduate and grad- 29 uate medical education in palliative care pursuant to section 2807-n of 30 the public health law, and the potential creation of teaching centers in 31 New York state; and 32 16. any other strategies that would improve hospice and palliative 33 care services in New York state with a collective goal of creating goal- 34 concordant care, promoting efficient use of resources, and ultimately 35 improving the quality of life of individuals as they age and at end-of- 36 life. 37 § 5. Reporting requirements. 1. No later than December 31, 2025, the 38 workgroup, in collaboration with academic partners, including the State 39 University of New York and the City University of New York, shall submit 40 an initial report containing all findings and recommendations to the 41 governor, the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the 42 assembly, the commissioner of health, the commissioner of mental health, 43 the minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the assembly, 44 and the chairs of the senate and assembly committees on health. 45 2. Subsequent to the submission of its report containing all findings 46 and recommendations, the workgroup may convene annually or as necessary 47 to discuss and update its findings and recommendations. 48 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire five 49 years after such effective date when upon such date the provisions of 50 this act shall be deemed repealed.